test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_eemeed_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - kilgool: # 1B g-v, CCVV > CV
    kilgool+N+Sg+Nom: kilgool
    kilgool+N+Sg+Gen: kilgool
    kilgool+N+Sg+Acc: kilgool
    kilgool+N+Sg+Ill: kiˊlgolân
    kilgool+N+Sg+Loc: kiˊlgolist
    kilgool+N+Sg+Com: kiˊlgoláin
    kilgool+N+Sg+Abe: kilgoolttáá
    kilgool+N+Ess: kiˊlgolin
    kilgool+N+Par: kiˊlgolid
    kilgool+N+Pl+Nom: kiˊlgoleh
    kilgool+N+Pl+Gen: kiˊlgolij
    kilgool+N+Pl+Acc: kiˊlgolijd
    kilgool+N+Pl+Ill: kiˊlgoláid
    kilgool+N+Pl+Loc: kiˊlgolijn
    kilgool+N+Pl+Com: kiˊlgolijguin
    kilgool+N+Pl+Abe: kiˊlgolijttáá

  Noun - čohhoom: # 1B g-v, hhoo-›ho
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Nom: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Gen: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Acc: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Ill: čohomân
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Loc: čohomist
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Com: čohomáin
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Abe: čohhoomttáá
    čohhoom+N+Ess: čohomin
    čohhoom+N+Par: čohomid
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Nom: čohomeh
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Gen: čohomij
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Acc: čohomijd
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Ill: čohomáid
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Loc: čohomijn
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Com: čohomijguin
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Abe: čohomijttáá

  Noun - kaavpug: #
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Nom: kaavpug
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Gen: kaavpug
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Acc: kaavpug
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Ill: kaˊvpugân
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Loc: kaˊvpugist
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Com: kaˊvpugáin
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Abe: kaavpugttáá
    kaavpug+N+Ess: kaˊvpugin
    kaavpug+N+Par: kaˊvpugid
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Nom: kaˊvpugeh
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Gen: kaˊvpugij
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Acc: kaˊvpugijd
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Ill: kaˊvpugáid
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Loc: kaˊvpugijn
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Com: kaˊvpugijguin
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Abe: kaˊvpugijttáá

  Noun - kolgooh:
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Nom: kolgooh
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Gen: kolgooh
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Acc: kolgooh
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Ill: koˊlgohân
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Loc: koˊlgohist
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Com: koˊlgoháin
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Abe: kolgoohttáá
    kolgooh+N+Ess: koˊlgohin
    kolgooh+N+Par: koˊlgohid
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Nom: koˊlgoheh
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Gen: koˊlgohij
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Acc: koˊlgohijd
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Ill: koˊlgoháid
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Loc: koˊlgohijn
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Com: koˊlgohijguin
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Abe: koˊlgohijttáá

  Noun - iššeed:
    iššeed+N+Sg+Nom: iššeed
    iššeed+N+Sg+Gen: iššeed
    iššeed+N+Sg+Acc: iššeed
    iššeed+N+Sg+Ill: iṣ̌edân
    iššeed+N+Sg+Loc: iṣ̌edist
    iššeed+N+Sg+Com: iṣ̌edáin
    iššeed+N+Sg+Abe: iššeedttáá
    iššeed+N+Ess: iṣ̌edin
    iššeed+N+Par: iṣ̌edid
    iššeed+N+Pl+Nom: iṣ̌edeh
    iššeed+N+Pl+Gen: iṣ̌edij
    iššeed+N+Pl+Acc: iṣ̌edijd
    iššeed+N+Pl+Ill: iṣ̌edáid
    iššeed+N+Pl+Loc: iṣ̌edijn
    iššeed+N+Pl+Com: iṣ̌edijguin
    iššeed+N+Pl+Abe: iṣ̌edijttáá

  Noun - vinnjooh: # 1B - ok
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Nom: vinnjooh
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Gen: vinnjooh
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Acc: vinnjooh
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Ill: viˊṇjohân
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Loc: viˊṇjohist
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Com: viˊṇjoháin
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Abe: vinnjoohttáá
    vinnjooh+N+Ess:    viˊṇjohin
    vinnjooh+N+Par:    viˊṇjohid
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Nom: viˊṇjoheh
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Gen: viˊṇjohij
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Acc: viˊṇjohijd
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Ill: viˊṇjoháid
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Loc: viˊṇjohijn
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Com: viˊṇjohijguin
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Abe: viˊṇjohijttáá

  Noun - suuhâm: # 1 
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Nom: suuhâm
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Gen: suuhâm
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Acc: suuhâm
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Ill: suhâmân
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Loc: suhâmist
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Com: suhâmáin
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Abe: suuhâmttáá
    suuhâm+N+Ess: suhâmin
    suuhâm+N+Par: suhâmid
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Nom: suhâmeh
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Gen: suhâmij
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Acc: suhâmijd
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Ill: suhâmáid
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Loc: suhâmijn
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Com: suhâmijguin
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Abe: suhâmijttáá

  Noun - mááccuh: # 1B Another lexicon for maaccuh could be LITTER
    mááccuh+N+Sg+Nom: mááccuh
    mááccuh+N+Sg+Gen: mááccuh
    mááccuh+N+Sg+Acc: mááccuh
    mááccuh+N+Sg+Ill: mácuhân
    mááccuh+N+Sg+Loc: mácuhist
    mááccuh+N+Sg+Com: mácuháin
    mááccuh+N+Sg+Abe: mááccuhttáá
    mááccuh+N+Ess: mácuhin
    mááccuh+N+Par: mácuhid
    mááccuh+N+Pl+Nom: mácuheh
    mááccuh+N+Pl+Gen: mácuhij
    mááccuh+N+Pl+Acc: mácuhijd
    mááccuh+N+Pl+Ill: mácuháid
    mááccuh+N+Pl+Loc: mácuhijn
    mááccuh+N+Pl+Com: mácuhijguin

  Noun - spääilih: # 1B
    spääilih+N+Sg+Nom: spääilih
    spääilih+N+Sg+Gen: spääilih
    spääilih+N+Sg+Acc: spääilih
    spääilih+N+Sg+Ill: späilihân
    spääilih+N+Sg+Loc: späilihist
    spääilih+N+Sg+Com: späiliháin
    spääilih+N+Sg+Abe: spääilihttáá
    spääilih+N+Ess: späilihin
    spääilih+N+Par: späilihid
    spääilih+N+Pl+Nom: späiliheh
    spääilih+N+Pl+Gen: späilihij
    spääilih+N+Pl+Acc: späilihijd
    spääilih+N+Pl+Ill: späiliháid
    spääilih+N+Pl+Loc: späilihijn
    spääilih+N+Pl+Com: späilihijguin
    spääilih+N+Pl+Abe: späilihijttáá
